Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10
Division of Workforce Services Law

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-8 may not apply to subchapters 9 and 10 which were enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Unemployment compensation income withholding for alimony or support payments, § 9-14-227.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 25: approved Feb. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an unemployment crisis exists in this State and in order to give better protection to the unemployed and their families extended benefits of the unemployment insurance program should be made available and to alleviate as much as possible the suffering and distress caused by unemployment, it is necessary to work in cooperation with the federal government; and in order to receive the benefits of federal law and comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 91-373, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 366, § 14: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the employed and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 11: Dec. 2, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the amendments to the Federal Unemployment Tax Act contained in Public Law 97-35 and to comply with other provisions of Federal law mandated by Public Law 97-35 so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and so that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when unemployed and qualified to receive such benefits, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 482, § 41: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to conform with P.L. 97-300 and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 97-248 and to insure the future solvency of the unemployment insurance fund so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, Nos. 8, 9, § 34: Jan. 30, 1985. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended by P.L. 98-21 and P.L. 98-369, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 6, § 21: Feb. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 32: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 19: Apr. 5, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 490, § 18: Mar. 26, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to make needed technical changes; to enable the state to capture and utilize penalty and interest owing from claimants; and in order that the state might continue to be in compliance with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Division of Workforce Services Law”.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 1; 1949, No. 155, § 1; 1977, No. 366, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1102; Acts 2007, No. 490, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 172.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “‘Division of Workforce Services Law’” for “‘Department of Workforce Services Law’”.

11-10-102. Policy.

As a guide to the interpretation and application of this chapter, the public policy of this state is declared to be as follows:

Economic insecurity due to unemployment is a serious menace to the health, morals, and welfare of the people of this state. Involuntary unemployment is a subject of general interest and concern which requires appropriate action by the General Assembly to prevent its spread and to lighten its burden which may fall with crushing force upon the unemployed worker and his or her family. The achievement of social security requires protection against this great hazard of our economic life.

This can be accomplished by encouraging employers to provide more stable employment and by the systematic accumulation of funds during periods of employment from which benefits may be paid for periods of unemployment, thus maintaining purchasing power and limiting the serious social consequences of poor relief assistance.

The General Assembly, therefore, declares that in its considered judgment the public good and the general welfare of the citizens of this state require the enactment of this measure, under the police power of the state, for the compulsory setting aside of unemployment reserves to be used for the benefit of persons unemployed through no fault of their own.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, preamble; 1949, No. 155, preamble; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1101.

11-10-103. Intent.

The General Assembly declares its intention to provide for the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter in cooperation with the appropriate agencies of other states and of the federal government as part of a nationwide employment security program to secure for this state and its citizens the grants and privileges available thereunder.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 1; 1949, No. 155, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1102.

11-10-104. Construction.

This chapter shall be construed to accomplish its purpose to promote employment security by increasing opportunities for placement through the maintenance of a system of public employment offices and by providing through accumulation of reserves for the payment of compensation to individuals who are involuntarily unemployed.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 1; 1949, No. 155, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1102.

11-10-105. Legislative power to amend and repeal — Vested rights restricted.

The General Assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this chapter or of any law heretofore enacted involving any employment security law.

There shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal nor shall there be vested any right accruing except as specifically expressed in this chapter or heretofore.

All rights, privileges, or immunities incurred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the General Assembly to amend or repeal this chapter or acts at any time.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1125.

11-10-106. Penalties.

False Statement or Representation.

Whoever makes a false statement or representation knowing it to be false or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit or other payment under this chapter or under the unemployment compensation law of any state or of the United States Government, either for himself or herself or for any other person, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) or by imprisonment for not longer than thirty (30) days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Each false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact shall constitute a separate offense.

Employer's False Statement or Representation.

Any employing unit or any officer or agent of any employing unit or any other person who makes a false statement or representation knowing it to be false, who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits to any individual entitled thereto or to avoid becoming or remaining subject hereto or to avoid or reduce any contribution or other payment required from an employing unit under this chapter, or who willfully fails or refuses to make any contributions or other payment or to furnish any report required hereunder or to produce or permit the inspection or copying of records as required hereunder shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for not longer than sixty (60) days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Each false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact and each day of the failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense.

Willful Violation.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter or any order or rule thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under the terms of this chapter, and for which a penalty is neither prescribed herein nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for not longer than sixty (60) days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Each day the violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

Disclosure of Information. If any employee or member of the Board of Review, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, or any employee of the director, in violation of the provisions of § 11-10-314, makes any disclosure of information obtained from any employing unit or individual in the administration of this chapter; if any person who has obtained any list of applicants for work, or of claimants or recipients of benefits, under this chapter shall use or permit the use of the list for any political purpose; or if any person who has lawfully obtained information from the Division of Workforce Services which was obtained from any employing unit or individual pursuant to the administration of this chapter makes an unlawful use or disclosure of the information or uses or discloses the information in a manner inconsistent with the purposes for which it was lawfully obtained, then that person shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned for not longer than ninety (90) days, or both.

Prosecution and Appeal.

Prosecutions for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter may be begun by the filing of information in any court having jurisdiction, without bond for costs, by the director, any field auditor, or other duly authorized agent of the director.

Appeals may be prosecuted from any verdicts or rulings contrary to the state, without appeal bonds, by the filing of a petition for appeal by any director, auditor, or agent.

Retaliation by Employer or Agent of Employer.

Any employing unit or any officer or agent of any employing unit or any other person who retaliates in regard to the hiring or tenure of work or any term or condition of work of any individual on account of his or her participating in the preparation for or testifying in a proceeding under this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for not longer than sixty (60) days, or both fine and imprisonment.

Each act of retaliation shall constitute a separate offense.

Penalty Imposed by Director.

The director is authorized and empowered to impose a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the face amount of the check, draft, or order, or ten dollars ($10.00), whichever is greater, against any employer or individual that or who as maker, drawer, or endorser makes payment of any contributions, or benefit overpayments, which are due under this chapter by means of a check, draft, or order drawn on any bank, person, firm, or corporation if the check, draft, or order is returned by the bank, person, firm, or corporation without having been paid in full.

This penalty is cumulative to any other penalties provided by law.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 16; 1943, No. 138, § 21; 1947, No. 398, § 13; 1983, No. 482, § 34; 1985, No. 8, § 29; 1985, No. 9, § 29; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1119; Acts 1987, No. 753, §§ 23, 24; 1991, No. 100, § 1; 1993, No. 6, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 802; 2019, No. 910, §
173.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “order or rule” for “order, rule, or regulation” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (d), substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-107. Protection of rights and benefits — Waiver of rights void — Discrimination, obstruction, and employee payment prohibited.

Any agreement by an individual to waive, release, or commute his or her rights to benefits or any other rights under this chapter shall be void.

Any agreements by an individual in the employ of any person or employing unit to pay all or any portion of an employer's contributions required under this chapter from the employer shall be void.

No employer shall directly or indirectly make, require, or accept any deduction from wages to finance the employer's contributions required from him or her, require or accept any waiver of any right hereunder by any individual in his or her employ, discriminate in regard to the hiring or tenure or work on any term or condition of work of any individual on account of his or her claiming benefits under this chapter, or in any manner obstruct or impede the filing of claims for benefits.

Any employer or officer or agent of an employer who violates any provisions of this section shall, for each offense, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1118.

11-10-108. Protection of rights and benefits — Limitation of fees.

No individual claiming benefits shall be charged fees or costs of any kind in any proceeding under this chapter by the Board of Review, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, or his or her or its representatives, or by any court or any officer thereof, except that, if the court determines that the proceedings for judicial review have been instituted or continued without reasonable grounds, it may assess costs against the claimant or employer instituting or continuing the proceedings.

Any individual claiming benefits in any proceeding before the director or the board or his or her or its representatives or a court may be represented by counsel or other duly authorized agent.

No counsel or agents shall either charge or receive an aggregate amount of more than five hundred dollars ($500) for services rendered at the administrative appeal levels before the appeal tribunal or the board.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall, for each offense, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 15; 1943, No. 138, § 20; 1983, No. 482, § 33; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1118; Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 174.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-109. Protection of rights and benefits — Assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of benefits prohibited.

Except as elsewhere provided in this section and § 11-10-110, any assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of any right to benefits which are or may become due or payable under this chapter shall be void.

Such rights to benefits shall be exempt from levy, execution, attachment, or any other remedy whatsoever provided for the collection of debt.

Benefits received by any individual, so long as they are not mingled with other funds of the recipient, shall be exempt from any remedy whatsoever for the collection of all debts except debts incurred for necessities furnished to such individual or his or her spouse or dependents during the time when that individual was unemployed.

Any waiver of any exemption provided for in this section and § 11-10-110 shall be void.

Benefits shall be subject to tax levies issued by the Internal Revenue Service in accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 6331(h) provided that an agreement is entered into between the Internal Revenue Service and the Division of Workforce Services and approved by the United States Department of Labor that provides for the payment of all administrative costs associated with processing the tax levies.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 15; 1981 (Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1118; Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 175.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (e).

Cross References.

Handling costs for withholding, § 16-110-417.

11-10-110. Protection of rights and benefits — Exception for withholding child support — Definitions.

At the time of filing the claim, an individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall disclose whether or not the individual owes child support obligations as defined under subdivision (g)(1) of this section. If any individual discloses that he or she owes child support obligations and is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency enforcing the obligation that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The director shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes child support obligations as defined under subdivision (g)(1) of this section:

The amount specified by the individual to the director to be deducted and withheld under this section if neither subdivision (b)(2) nor subdivision (b)(3) of this section is applicable;

The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the director under section 454(19)(B)(i) of the Social Security Act by the state or local child support enforcement agency, unless subdivision (b)(3) of this section is applicable; or

Any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from his or her unemployment compensation pursuant to legal process, as that term is defined in section 462(e) of the Social Security Act, properly served upon the director.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid by the director to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by the individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual's child support obligations.

For purposes of subsections (a)-(d) of this section, the term “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under this chapter, including amounts payable by the director pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for the administrative costs incurred by the director under this section which are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support enforcement agency.

The term “child support obligations” is defined for purposes of these provisions as including only obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in section 454 of the Social Security Act which has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.

The term “state or local child support enforcement agency” as used in this chapter means any agency of this state or a political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in subdivision (g)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 15; 1981 (Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1118; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 176.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

Cross References.

Handling costs for withholding, § 16-110-417.

U.S. Code.

Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq. Section 454 is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 654. Section 462 was repealed by Act Aug. 22, 1996, P.L. 104-193.

11-10-111. Protection of rights and benefits — Exception for withholding food stamp overages — Definition.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall at the time of filing the claim disclose whether or not he or she owes an uncollected overissuance, as defined in section 13(c)(1) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977, of food stamp coupons.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall notify the state food stamp agency enforcing the obligation of any individual who discloses that he or she owes a food stamp overage obligation and who is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The director shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes an uncollected overissuance:

The amount specified by the individual to the director to be deducted and withheld under this section;

The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the state food stamp agency under section 13(c)(3)(A) of the Food Stamp Act of 1977; or

Any amount otherwise required to be deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation pursuant to section 13(c)(3)(B) of the Food Stamp Act of 1997.

Any amount deducted and withheld under this section shall be paid by the director to the food stamp program administered by the Division of County Operations.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by the individual to the Department of Human Services as repayment of the individual's uncollected food stamp overissuance.

For purposes of this section, the term “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under this act, including amounts payable by the director pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

This section applies only after an agreement has been made for reimbursement by the department for the administrative costs incurred by the director under this section which are attributable to the repayment of uncollected food stamp overissuances.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 177.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The food stamp program, which is administered by the Division of County Operations of the Department of Human Services, is a federal program. The program is now referred to as the “Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program”, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1997, No. 234, codified as §§ 11-10-111, 11-10-201, 11-10-208, 11-10-210, 11-10-305, 11-10-308, 11-10-314, 11-10-513, 11-10-515, 11-10-522 — 11-10-524, 11-10-526, 11-10-529, 11-10-532, 11-10-703, 11-10-705, 11-10-706, 11-10-717, 11-10-719, 11-10-801, 11-10-802.

U.S. Code.

Section 13 of the Food Stamp Act of 1977, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2022.